Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-940
Former federal employee; late registration to vote; voting; when allowed.

Any person employed in federal service whose status has been terminated by discharge from the armed forces or by separation from employment outside the territorial limits of the United States who was unable to register to vote may register to vote after the voter registration deadline by completing the necessary voter registration application in the office of the election commissioner or county clerk of the county of his or her residence no later than noon of the day before the election. After completing the voter registration application, such person shall then be allowed to vote in the election office.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 283;

Laws 2005, LB 98, § 12;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 42.